Maine, session 132, LD898.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §628, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 2023, c. 266, §1, is further
amended to read:
An employer may not discriminate between employees in the same establishment on
the basis of sex by paying wages to any employee in any occupation in this State at a rate
less than the rate at which the employer pays any employee of the opposite sex for
comparable work on jobs that have comparable requirements relating to skill, effort and
responsibility. An employer may not discriminate between employees in the same
establishment on the basis of race by paying wages to any employee in any occupation in
this State at a rate less than the rate at which the employer pays any employee of another
race for comparable work on jobs that have comparable requirements relating to skill, effort
and responsibility. Differentials This section does not apply to differentials that do not
discriminate on the basis of sex or race and that are paid to an employee pursuant to
established seniority systems or merit increase systems or; pursuant to a difference in the
shift or time of the day worked that do not discriminate on the basis of sex or race are not
within the prohibitions in this section; pursuant to the geographic location of the employee's
work site; or pursuant to an employee's experience or credentials. An employer may not
discharge or discriminate against any employee by reason of any action taken by such
employee to invoke or assist in any manner the enforcement of this section. An employer
may not prohibit an employee from disclosing the employee's own wages or from inquiring
about or disclosing another employee's wages if the purpose of the disclosure or inquiry is
to enforce the rights granted by this section. Nothing in this This section creates does not
create an obligation to disclose wages.